Hawaii statutes.
[§356D-58] Lien attaches to personalty in
possession. Sections 356D-56 and 356D-57 shall also apply to any personal
property which, before May 2, 1949, was left in or about any public
housing project, and was taken into the possession of the authority or its
predecessor in interest, as herein set forth and provided. [L 2006, c 180, pt
of §2]

Note

Section 356D-56 referred to in text is repealed. For present
provision, see §356D-56.1.

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next